Utah statutes.
15-3-1.   Conveyances, releases, sales by persons acting jointly.
A conveyance, release or sale may be made to or by two or more persons acting
jointly and one or more, but less than all, of these persons acting either by
himself or themselves or with other persons; and a contract may be made
between such parties.
